Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-267
Distribution in kind; limitation.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of his or her contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him or her exceeds a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which he or she shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 35;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 40.